Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-365.08
Sewerage systems and sewage disposal plants; minutes; plans; contracts; bids.

Whenever the city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall have ordered the installation of a sewerage system, including any storm sewer system, and sewage disposal plant or the improvement or extension of an existing system, the fact that such order was issued shall be recited in the official minutes of the city council. The city council shall require that plans and specifications be prepared of such sewerage system, including any storm sewer system, and sewage disposal plant, or such improvement or extension. Upon approval of such plans, the city council shall advertise for sealed bids for the construction of such improvements once a week three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation within the city. The contract for such construction shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

Laws 1953, c. 24, § 8, p. 102;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 74.
July 21, 2022
Requirements for competitive bidding are strictly construed against public authorities, but where a process or article is patented, public authorities may specify its use without competitive bidding if it possesses such exceptional superiority that it would be a public injury not to use it. Cosentino v. City of Omaha, 186 Neb. 407, 183 N.W.2d 475 (1971).